Massachusetts, session 194th, H881.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 42G1/2 of chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
official edition, is herby amended by striking out the following in subsection (d):  
If necessary to comply with federal law, the division of medical assistance and the 
commonwealth health insurance connector authority may allow an applicant to decline to register 
to vote at the time of application. Otherwise, all automatic voter registration agencies, including 
the registry of motor vehicles, shall transmit records of all eligible applicants as provided in 
subsection (e) and these applicants may decline to register to vote only after receiving notice 
from the registrars under paragraph (3) of said subsection (d) of said section 65.